Massachusetts, session 194th, S1819.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding subsection (2) (g) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, or any other general or special law to the
contrary, employees of the towns, who are in the Barnstable county retirement system, employed
as police or fire dispatcher operators, managers or supervisors, who were hired on or before
January 1, 2023 with a group 2 classification under subsection (2) (g), section 3 of chapter 32 of
the General Laws, shall not have said classification changed or altered unless enhanced by
statute.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding subsection (2) (g) of section 3 of chapter 32 of the
General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, or any other general or special law to
of 2

the contrary, members in service, who retired from the Barnstable county retirement system as a
police, fire or emergency medical dispatch operator, manager or supervisor with a Group 2
classification under subsection (2) (g), section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, shall not
have said classification changed or altered unless enhanced by statute.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2